gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_7.aff
FLAG long
# s'enquérir [P]
SFX iM Y 42
SFX iM   quérir     quérir/n'q'd'l'm't's'       quérir              po:infi
SFX iM   quérir     quérant/n'q'd'l'm't's'      quérir              po:ppre
SFX iM   quérir     quis/L'D'Q'                 quérir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX iM   quérir     quise/L'D'Q'                quérir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iM   quérir     quises/D'Q'                 quérir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iM   quérir     quiers/j'n'q'l'm't'         quérir              po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quiert/n'q'l'm't's'         quérir              po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     quérons/n'q'l't'            quérir              po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     quérez/n'q'l'm'             quérir              po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     quièrent/n'q'l'm't's'       quérir              po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iM   quérir     quérais/j'n'q'l'm't'        quérir              po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quérait/n'q'l'm't's'        quérir              po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     quérions/n'q'l't'           quérir              po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     quériez/n'q'l'm'            quérir              po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     quéraient/n'q'l'm't's'      quérir              po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iM   quérir     quis/j'n'q'l'm't'           quérir              po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quit/n'q'l'm't's'           quérir              po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     quîmes/n'q'l't'             quérir              po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     quîtes/n'q'l'm'             quérir              po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     quirent/n'q'l'm't's'        quérir              po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iM   quérir     querrai/j'n'q'l'm't'        quérir              po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iM   quérir     querras/n'q'l'm't'          quérir              po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     querra/n'q'l'm't's'         quérir              po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     querrons/n'q'l't'           quérir              po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     querrez/n'q'l'm'            quérir              po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     querront/n'q'l'm't's'       quérir              po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iM   quérir     querrais/j'n'q'l'm't'       quérir              po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     querrait/n'q'l'm't's'       quérir              po:cond po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     querrions/n'q'l't'          quérir              po:cond po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     querriez/n'q'l'm'           quérir              po:cond po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     querraient/n'q'l'm't's'     quérir              po:cond po:3pl
SFX iM   quérir     quière/j'n'q'l'm't's'       quérir              po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     quières/n'q'l'm't'          quérir              po:spre po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quisse/j'n'q'l'm't'         quérir              po:simp po:1sg
SFX iM   quérir     quisses/n'q'l'm't'          quérir              po:simp po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quît/n'q'l'm't's'           quérir              po:simp po:3sg
SFX iM   quérir     quissions/n'q'l't'          quérir              po:simp po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     quissiez/n'q'l'm'           quérir              po:simp po:2pl
SFX iM   quérir     quissent/n'q'l'm't's'       quérir              po:simp po:3pl
SFX iM   quérir     quiers/n'l'm't'             quérir              po:impe po:2sg
SFX iM   quérir     quérons/n'l't'              quérir              po:impe po:1pl
SFX iM   quérir     quérez/n'l'm'               quérir              po:impe po:2pl

# fuir [I,T,P]
SFX iN Y 41
SFX iN   uir        uir/n'q'd'l'm't's'          fuir                po:infi
SFX iN   uir        uyant/n'q'd'l'm't's'        fuir                po:ppre
SFX iN   uir        ui/d'q'                     fuir                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iN   uir        uis/d'q'                    fuir                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iN   uir        uie/d'q'                    fuir                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iN   uir        uies/d'q'                   fuir                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iN   uir        uis/j'n'q'l'm't'            fuir                po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uit/n'q'l'm't's'            fuir                po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uyons/n'q'l't'              fuir                po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uyez/n'q'l'm'               fuir                po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uient/n'q'l'm't's'          fuir                po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iN   uir        uyais/j'n'q'l'm't'          fuir                po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uyait/n'q'l'm't's'          fuir                po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uyions/n'q'l't'             fuir                po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uyiez/n'q'l'm'              fuir                po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uyaient/n'q'l'm't's'        fuir                po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iN   uir        uîmes/n'q'l't'              fuir                po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uîtes/n'q'l'm'              fuir                po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uirent/n'q'l'm't's'         fuir                po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iN   uir        uirai/j'n'q'l'm't'          fuir                po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iN   uir        uiras/n'q'l'm't'            fuir                po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uira/n'q'l'm't's'           fuir                po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uirons/n'q'l't'             fuir                po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uirez/n'q'l'm'              fuir                po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uiront/n'q'l'm't's'         fuir                po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iN   uir        uirais/j'n'q'l'm't'         fuir                po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uirait/n'q'l'm't's'         fuir                po:cond po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uirions/n'q'l't'            fuir                po:cond po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uiriez/n'q'l'm'             fuir                po:cond po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uiraient/n'q'l'm't's'       fuir                po:cond po:3pl
SFX iN   uir        uie/j'n'q'l'm't's'          fuir                po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uies/n'q'l'm't'             fuir                po:spre po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uisse/j'n'q'l'm't'          fuir                po:simp po:1sg
SFX iN   uir        uisses/n'q'l'm't'           fuir                po:simp po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uît/n'q'l'm't's'            fuir                po:simp po:3sg
SFX iN   uir        uissions/n'q'l't'           fuir                po:simp po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uissiez/n'q'l'm'            fuir                po:simp po:2pl
SFX iN   uir        uissent/n'q'l'm't's'        fuir                po:simp po:3pl
SFX iN   uir        uis/n'l'm't'                fuir                po:impe po:2sg
SFX iN   uir        uyons/n'l't'                fuir                po:impe po:1pl
SFX iN   uir        uyez/n'l'm'                 fuir                po:impe po:2pl

# s'enfuir [P]
SFX iO Y 41
SFX iO   fuir       fuir/n'q'd'l'm't's'         enfuir              po:infi
SFX iO   fuir       fuyant/n'q'd'l'm't's'       enfuir              po:ppre
SFX iO   fuir       fui/L'D'Q'                  enfuir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuis/D'Q'                   enfuir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuie/L'D'Q'                 enfuir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuies/D'Q'                  enfuir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuis/j'n'q'l'm't'           enfuir              po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuit/n'q'l'm't's'           enfuir              po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuyons/n'q'l't'             enfuir              po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuyez/n'q'l'm'              enfuir              po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuient/n'q'l'm't's'         enfuir              po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuyais/j'n'q'l'm't'         enfuir              po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuyait/n'q'l'm't's'         enfuir              po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuyions/n'q'l't'            enfuir              po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuyiez/n'q'l'm'             enfuir              po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuyaient/n'q'l'm't's'       enfuir              po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuîmes/n'q'l't'             enfuir              po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuîtes/n'q'l'm'             enfuir              po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuirent/n'q'l'm't's'        enfuir              po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iO   fuir       fuirai/j'n'q'l'm't'         enfuir              po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuiras/n'q'l'm't'           enfuir              po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuira/n'q'l'm't's'          enfuir              po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuirons/n'q'l't'            enfuir              po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuirez/n'q'l'm'             enfuir              po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuiront/n'q'l'm't's'        enfuir              po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iO   fuir       fuirais/j'n'q'l'm't'        enfuir              po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuirait/n'q'l'm't's'        enfuir              po:cond po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuirions/n'q'l't'           enfuir              po:cond po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuiriez/n'q'l'm'            enfuir              po:cond po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuiraient/n'q'l'm't's'      enfuir              po:cond po:3pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuie/j'n'q'l'm't's'         enfuir              po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuies/n'q'l'm't'            enfuir              po:spre po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuisse/j'n'q'l'm't'         enfuir              po:simp po:1sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuisses/n'q'l'm't'          enfuir              po:simp po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuît/n'q'l'm't's'           enfuir              po:simp po:3sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuissions/n'q'l't'          enfuir              po:simp po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuissiez/n'q'l'm'           enfuir              po:simp po:2pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuissent/n'q'l'm't's'       enfuir              po:simp po:3pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuis/n'l'm't'               enfuir              po:impe po:2sg
SFX iO   fuir       fuyons/n'l't'               enfuir              po:impe po:1pl
SFX iO   fuir       fuyez/n'l'm'                enfuir              po:impe po:2pl
